da: Stylusunderstøttelse: Kompatibel (stylus valgfri); Ikke understøttet; Stylus inkluderet; Andet
pt-BR: Suporte para caneta stylus: Compatível (stylus opcional); Não compatível; Stylus incluído; Outro
it: Supporto per pennino: Compatibile (stilo opzionale); Non supportata; Stilo incluso; Altro
fi: Kynän tuki: Yhteensopiva (kynä valinnainen); Ei tuettu; Kynä mukana; Muu
nl: Stylusondersteuning: Compatibel (stylus optioneel); Niet ondersteund; Stylus inbegrepen; Andere
el: Υποστήριξη γραφίδας: Συμβατό (προαιρετική γραφίδα); Δεν υποστηρίζεται; Περιλαμβάνεται γραφίδα; Άλλο
en: Stylus support: Compatible (stylus optional); Not supported; Stylus included; Other
hr-HR: Podrška za olovku: Kompatibilan (olovka opcionalna); Nije podržano; Olovka uključena; Ostalo
hu: Ceruzatámogatás: Kompatibilis (toll opcionális); Nem támogatott; Toll mellékelve; Egyéb
sv: Stöd för penna: Kompatibel (penna valfri); Stöds inte; Penna ingår; Övrigt
pt-PT: Suporte para caneta stylus: Compatível (stylus opcional); Não suportado; Stylus incluído; Outro
bg-BG: Поддръжка на писалка: Съвместим (писалката е по избор); Не се поддържа; Писалка включена; Други
pl: Obsługa rysika: Kompatybilny (rysik opcjonalny); Nieobsługiwane; Rysik w zestawie; Inne
sk-SK: Podpora dotykového pera: Kompatibilný (stylus voliteľný); Nie je podporované; Vrátane stylusu; Iné
ru: Поддержка стилуса: Совместим (стилус опционален); Не поддерживается; Стилус в комплекте; Другой
fr: Prise en charge de stylet: Compatible (stylet optionnel); Non pris en charge; Stylet inclus; Autre
de: Stift-Unterstützung: Kompatibel (Stylus optional); Nicht unterstützt; Stylus inklusive; Sonstiges
ko: 스타일러스 지원: 호환 가능 (스타일러스 옵션); 지원되지 않음; 스타일러스 포함; 기타
ro-RO: Suport pentru peniță digitală: Compatibil (stylus opțional); Neacceptată; Stylus inclus; Altele
cs: Podpora stylusu: Kompatibilní (stylus volitelný); Nepodporováno; Stylus v balení; Jiné
tr: Kalem desteği: Uyumlu (stylus opsiyonel); Desteklenmiyor; Stylus dahil; Diğer
th: การรองรับปากกาสไตลัส: รองรับ (ปากกาเป็นตัวเลือก); ไม่รองรับ; ปากการวม; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Rašiklio palaikymas: Suderinamas (rašiklis neprivalomas); Nepalaikoma; Rašiklis įtrauktas; Kita
zh-TW: 觸控筆支援: 相容（觸控筆為選配）; 不支援; 附觸控筆; 其他
ja: スタイラスサポート: 対応（スタイラス別売）; 非対応; スタイラス付属; その他
es: Soporte para stylus: Compatible (lápiz óptico opcional); No compatible; Lápiz óptico incluido; Otros
vi: Hỗ trợ bút cảm ứng: Tương thích (bút stylus tùy chọn); Không hỗ trợ; Bút stylus đi kèm; Khác
sl-SI: Podpora za pisalo: Združljivo (pisalo po izbiri); Ni podprto; Pisalo vključeno; Drugo
zh-CN: 触控笔支持: 兼容（手写笔可选）; 不支持; 含手写笔; 其他
nb: Pekepennstøtte: Kompatibel (stylus valgfri); Ikke støttet; Stylus inkludert; Annet